North Carolina, session 2025, HB1050.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty-one thousand dollars ($31,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Joyful Soul Treasures, Inc., a nonprofit
organization, for a marketing campaign and an eight-week workshop event, including materials,
instructor fees, refreshments, completion certificates, and awards, designed to enhance sexual
health education and awareness among adolescents aged 13-18.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1050-v-1*